Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.124.030

Credits for related supplemental instruction.

All institutions of higher education, as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, must establish a policy for granting as many credits as possible and appropriate, for related supplemental instruction in active state apprenticeship programs, registered during or before July 1, 2022, by the 2028-29 school year. For all state registered apprenticeship programs approved after July 1, 2022, all institutions of higher education, as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, must establish a policy for granting as many credits, as possible and appropriate, for related supplemental instruction within six years of the program's registration. While establishing credits, institutions of higher education must consult with their faculty representatives. Credits are at the sole discretion of each institution of higher education and must be determined in consultation with their faculty representatives. Credits established by institutions of higher education are not intended to impact the possible revision of previously approved related supplemental instruction in a state registered apprenticeship program.

[ 2022 c 166 s 4.]